Washington statutes.
RCW 19.345.020

Prohibited acts—Application of consumer protection act.

(1) A person may not:

(a) Use software to circumvent, thwart, interfere with, or evade a security measure, access control system, or other control or measure on a ticket seller's internet website; or

(b) Sell software that is advertised for profit with the express purpose to circumvent, thwart, interfere with, or evade a security measure, access control system, or other control or measure on a ticket seller's internet website.

(2) The use or sale of software as described in subsection (1) of this section only violates this section if the user or seller knows or should know that the purpose of the software is to circumvent, thwart, interfere with, or evade a security measure, access control system, or other control or measure on a ticket seller's internet website.

(3) The legislature finds that the conduct described in subsection (1) of this section vitally affects the public interest for the purpose of applying the consumer protection act, chapter 19.86 RCW. Using or selling software to circumvent, thwart, or evade a control or measure, which is used on a ticket seller's internet website to ensure an equitable distribution of tickets, is not reasonable in relation to the development and preservation of business and is an unfair or deceptive act in trade or commerce and an unfair method of competition for the purposes of applying the consumer protection act, chapter 19.86 RCW.

[ 2015 c 129 s 3.]